California statutes. Penal Code
(b) Inmates transferred to community correctional centers remain under the legal custody of the department and shall be subject at any time, pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Director of Corrections, to be detained in the county jail upon the exercise of a state parole or correctional officer’s peace officer powers as specified in Section 830.5, with the consent of the sheriff or corresponding official having jurisdiction over the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 961, Sec. 4.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6254.

The Director of Corrections may grant furloughs to residents of community correctional centers for the purpose of employment, education, including vocational training, or arranging a suitable employment and residence program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 772.)
-------------------------------------------

6255.

The provisions of Title 5 (commencing with Section 4500) of Part 3 shall apply to all persons placed in a community correctional center by the Director of Corrections except that those persons who are on active parole shall be subject to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 3040) of Chapter 8, Title 1, Part 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1931.)
-------------------------------------------

6256.

The Director of Corrections may enter into contracts, with the approval of the Director of General Services, with appropriate public or private agencies, to provide housing, sustenance, and supervision for such inmates as are eligible for placement in community correctional centers. Prisoners in the care of such agencies shall be subject to all provisions of law applicable to them.

The Department of Corrections shall reimburse such agencies for their services from such funds as may be appropriated for the support of state prisoners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

6258.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may contract for the establishment and operation of separate community correctional reentry centers for men and women, provided that the per-inmate cost for operating these facilities under contract will be less than the per-inmate cost of maintaining custody of the inmates by the department. The department may enter into long-term contracts, not to exceed 10 years, for transfer of prisoners to, or placement of prisoners in,
 facilities under contract pursuant to this section.

(b) The purpose of the community correctional reentry center is to provide an enhancement program to increase the likelihood of a successful parole. The objective of the program is to make the inmates aware of their responsibility to society, and to assist the inmates with educational and employment training to ensure employability once on parole.

(c) A community correctional reentry center shall prepare the inmate for reintegration into society. These centers shall provide counseling in the areas of drug and alcohol abuse, stress, employment skills, victim awareness, and shall, in general, prepare the inmate for return to society. The program shall also emphasize literacy training and utilize computer-supported training so that the inmate can read and write at least at a
 9th-grade level.

(d) In awarding contracts pursuant to this section, the
 secretary shall advertise the potential contract and may entertain proposals for the establishment and operation of community correctional reentry centers from public and private entities and shall give preference to the following community correctional reentry centers:

(1) Centers located near large population centers.

(2) Centers with approved state or local land use.

(3) Centers with an identified facility with appropriate capacity to serve not greater than 200 individuals.

(4) Centers that provide a rehabilitative, supportive setting and programming that is trauma-informed, culturally responsive, and community oriented in order to improve the outcomes of the participants and reduce recidivism.

(5) Centers operated by a nonprofit organization that has demonstrated experience successfully operating
 community correctional reentry centers.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in subdivision (d), for the purposes of entering into or renewing agreements pursuant to this section, any process, regulation, or requirement, including any state government reviews or approvals, or third-party approval that is required under, or implemented pursuant to, any statute that relates to entering into or renewing those agreements, is hereby waived.

(f) On or after October 14, 2023, the department shall not contract for the establishment or operation of a community correctional reentry center located in current or former state prison facilities or on current or
 former state prison property. This subdivision does not apply to other types of facilities owned or operated by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 190, Sec. 8.   (SB 135)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6258.1.

An inmate shall not be transferred to a community correctional reentry facility unless all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The inmate applies for a transfer to a community correctional reentry facility.

(b) The inmate does not have a current or prior conviction for an offense that requires
 registration as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(c) The inmate has less than two years left to serve in a correctional facility.

(d) The inmate does not have a history, within the prior 10 years, of an escape pursuant to Section 4532 of the Penal Code.

(e) The department determines that the inmate would benefit from
 the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 21.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6259.

(a) For the purposes of acquiring the 2,000 community correctional facility beds and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the procurement and performance of any contracts authorized pursuant to Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Part 3 of Title 7 of the Penal Code shall be conducted under the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 10335) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, as a contract for services.

(b) The procurement shall include
 requirements that the contractor provide to the state options to purchase all or a portion of the facilities and equipment used by the vendor in the performance of the contract and that the consideration of the proposals include the terms of these options. The contract shall provide specifications for the vendor’s acquisition of sites, compliance with environmental requirements, preparation of plans and specifications for, and development and operation of, facilities, and such other matters as may be reasonably incidental to the development, operation, and potential future acquisition by the state pursuant to an option to purchase the facilities.

(c) The exercise of an option to purchase shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the State Public Works Board and the requirements of the master plan for prison construction, Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7000) of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, the State Contract Act, Chapter 1 (commencing
 with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Building Construction Act of 1955, Part 10b (commencing with Section 15800) of Division 3 of the Government Code, and the Property Acquisition Law, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of the Government Code, but these provisions shall not apply to the procurement of the option to purchase or the procurement and performance of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 500, Sec. 3.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.6. Work Furlough Programs [6260. - 6265.]

6260.

The Legislature finds and declares the following: that overcrowding in correctional institutions is not a desirable method of housing state inmates; that other methods of housing should be developed for appropriate state inmates, particularly if they can be less costly; that reentry programs for inmates who are nearing the completion of their term of incarceration provides a more normal environment and an opportunity to begin reintegrating into society; and that work furlough programs are appropriate only for specified types of inmates for a limited period of time prior to release back into society; and that existing law already recognizes the
 appropriateness of placing inmates in community facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6261.

(a) To the extent that public and private nonprofit and profit corporations have available beds and satisfy the criteria specified in this chapter, the Department of Corrections shall contract with them to provide reentry work furlough programs for all inmates 120 days prior to scheduled release and who are not excluded under this chapter.

(b) The Department of Corrections shall contract with private nonprofit and profit corporations for at least 13 of all reentry work
 furlough beds, unless the department determines these beds are not available or do not comply with this chapter. The department shall report annually in writing to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of the actions performed to locate those beds or reasons for noncompliance. This provision shall not be interpreted to impair existing contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1608, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6262.

The Department of Corrections may contract with a public or private nonprofit or profit corporation meeting all the following conditions:

(a) Availability of a work furlough facility in compliance with standards established by the Department of Corrections.

(b) Location of a facility in proximity to geographical areas providing employment opportunities and public transportation services.

(c) Cost proposals equal to or less than the per capita amount for housing in a
 correctional institution, including administrative costs.

(d) Criteria for placement that does not differ significantly from the policies of the Department of Corrections.

(e) Submission by the agency of operational guidelines that are approved by the Department of Corrections pursuant to its classification manual.

(f) Compliance with other requirements deemed appropriate by the Department of Corrections, including, but not limited to, visiting procedures, 24-hour security, and recreation.

(g) Efficient fiscal management and financially solvent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6263.

(a) The Department of Corrections shall deny placement in a reentry work furlough program if it determines that an inmate would pose an unreasonable risk to the public, or if any one of the following factors exist, except in unusual circumstances, including, but not limited to, the remoteness in time of the commission of the offense:

(1) Conviction of a crime involving sex or arson.

(2) History of forced escape, or of drug use, sales, or addiction.

(3) Parole program or employment outside the area served by the facility.

(4) History of serious institutional misconduct.

(5) Prior placement in a protective housing unit within a correctional institution, except a person placed there while assisting a public entity in a civil or criminal matter.

(6) More than one conviction of a crime of violence.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit the discretion of the Department of Corrections to deny placement when the provisions of subdivision (a) do not apply.

(c) Inmates transferred to reentry work furlough remain under the legal custody of the department and shall
 be subject at any time, pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Director of Corrections, to be detained in the county jail upon the exercise of a state parole or correctional officer’s peace officer powers as specified in Section 830.5, with the consent of the sheriff or corresponding official having jurisdiction over the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 961, Sec. 5.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6264.

The Department of Corrections shall review each inmate for work furlough consideration at least 120 days prior to his or her scheduled parole date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6265.

Any inmate violating the conditions of the work furlough prescribed by the Department of Corrections shall be subject to the disciplinary procedures identified in its classification manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.7. Special Facilities [6267. - 6267.]

6267.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the program authorized under this section is to address the special needs of inmates with regard to the provision of long-term care in skilled nursing facilities.

(2) The department may contract with public or private entities for the establishment and operation of skilled nursing facilities for the incarceration and care of inmates who are limited in ability to perform activities of daily living
 and who are in need of skilled nursing services. The skilled nursing facility under contract pursuant to this section shall address the long-term care of inmates as needed. In addition, the facility shall be designed to maximize the personal security of inmates, to maximize the security of the facility, and to ensure the safety of the outside community at large.

(b) The department shall provide for the security of the facility in order to ensure the safety of the outside community at large.

(c) The department shall enter into an agreement for transfer of prisoners to, or placement of prisoners in, skilled nursing facilities pursuant to this section.

(d) The facility contractor shall ensure that the facility meets all licensing requirements by obtaining a license for the skilled nursing facility, as that term is
 defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) The department shall provide for the review of any agreement entered into under this section to determine if the facility contractor is in compliance with the requirements of this section, and may revoke the agreement if the facility contractor is not in compliance.

(f) The Department of Corrections ombudsman program shall provide ombudsman services to prisoner residents of the department-contracted skilled nursing facilities.

(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 9700) of Division 8.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman shall be exempt from advocating on behalf of, or investigating complaints on behalf of residents of any skilled nursing facilities operated either directly
 or by contract by the Department of Corrections.

(h) As used in this section, “long-term care” means personal or supportive care services provided to people of all ages with physical or mental disabilities who need assistance with activities of daily living including bathing, eating, dressing, toileting, transferring, and ambulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Regional Jail Camps [6300. - 6304.]

6300.

The Department of Corrections is authorized to establish and operate regional jail camps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1646.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.

The primary purpose of the camps shall be the confinement, treatment, and care of persons sentenced to long jail terms, including persons so imprisoned as a condition of probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 166.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

The Director of Corrections shall make rules and regulations governing eligibility for commitment or transfer to such camps and rules and regulations for the government of such camps. Subject to the rules and regulations of the Director of Corrections, and if there is in effect for the county a contract entered into pursuant to Section 6303, a county prisoner may be committed to a regional jail camp in lieu of commitment to a county jail or other county detention facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1646.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

(a) The director may enter into a contract, with the approval of the Director of General Services, with any county of the state, upon the request of the board of supervisors thereof, wherein the Director of Corrections agrees to furnish confinement, care, treatment, and employment of county prisoners. The county shall reimburse the state for the cost of such services, such cost to be determined by the Director of Finance. Each county auditor shall include in his state settlement report rendered to the Controller in the months of January and June the amounts due under any contract authorized by this section, and the county treasurer, at the time of
 settlement with the state in such months, shall pay to the State Treasurer upon order of the Controller, the amounts found to be due. 

(b) The Department of Corrections shall accept such county prisoner if it believes that the prisoner can be materially benefited by such confinement, care, treatment, and employment, and if adequate facilities to provide such care are available. No such person shall be transported to any facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections until the director has notified the referring court of the place to which said person is to be transmitted and the time at which he can be received.

(c) The sheriff of the county in which such an order is made placing a misdemeanant in a jail camp pursuant to this chapter, or any other peace officer designated by the court, shall execute an order placing such county prisoner in the jail camp or
 returning him therefrom to the court. The expense of such sheriff or peace officer incurred in executing such order is a charge upon the county in which the court is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

6304.

The Director of Corrections may return to the committing authority any person committed transferred to a regional jail camp pursuant to this chapter when there is no suitable employment or when such person is guilty of any violation of rules and regulations of the regional jail camp.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1646.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Prison Visitor Services [6350. - 6356.]

6350.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Maintaining an inmate’s family and community relationships is an effective correctional technique which reduces recidivism.

(b) Enhancing visitor services increases the frequency and quality of visits, thereby discouraging violent prisoner activity.

(c) The location of prisons and lack of services to assist visitors impedes visiting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6351.

The Department of Corrections shall contract with a private nonprofit agency or agencies to establish and operate a visitor center outside each state adult prison in California which has a population of more than 300 inmates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6352.

Each visitor center shall provide, at a minimum, each of the following services to prison visitors:

(a) Assistance to visitors with transportation between public transit terminals and prisons.

(b) Child care for visitors’ children.

(c) Emergency clothing.

(d) Information on visiting regulations and processes.

(e) Referral to other
 agencies and services.

(f) A sheltered area, which is outside of the security perimeter, for visitors who are waiting before or after visits.

In addition, each center shall maintain working relations with the local community and institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 143.)
-------------------------------------------

6353.

Each nonprofit agency which the department contracts with pursuant to Section 6351 shall submit to the department and to the Legislature an annual report which includes, but is not limited to, the following information:

(a) A description of the barriers to visiting.

(b) A quantitative and narrative description of the services which it rendered.

(c) A description of the impact of the centers which it provided on visiting.

(d) A description of areas for improvement of services or coordination with other public or private agencies.

(e) A description of the community resources which it utilized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6354.

The Department of Corrections shall employ all the following criteria in selecting the agency or agencies with which it contracts pursuant to Section 6351:

(a) The number and quality of services proposed in comparison to direct program costs.

(b) Prior experience in establishing and operating prison visitor service centers in California.

(c) Prior experience in working cooperatively with the department, other correctional agencies, community programs, inmates,
 visitors, and the general public. 

(d) The ability to use volunteers and other community resources to maximize the cost effectiveness of this program.

(e) The identified needs of visitors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6355.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit the department in developing additional programs or making all reasonable efforts to promote visits to prisoners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6356.

The department shall cooperate with the Department of Transportation in the development of public transportation services to prisons, pursuant to Section 14035.9 of the Government Code and Section 99317.9 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 603, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.7. Prison Visitation [6400. - 6405.]

6400.

Any amendments to existing regulations and any future regulations adopted by the Department of Corrections which may impact the visitation of inmates shall do all of the following:

(a) Recognize and consider the value of visiting as a means to improve the safety of prisons for both staff and inmates.

(b) Recognize and consider the important role of inmate visitation in establishing and maintaining a meaningful connection with family and
 community.

(c) Recognize and consider the important role of inmate visitation in preparing an inmate for successful release and rehabilitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.

(a) (1) At intake, every incarcerated person shall be asked whom they want covered by the following documents and shall be assisted in completing the necessary paperwork for the following documents:

(A) Approved visitor list. If the incarcerated person would like to add a visitor, the department shall provide a visitor application form for the incarcerated person to
 sign and send to the potential visitor, who may then complete and submit it to the visiting department of the facility.

(B) Medical release of information form.

(C) Medical power of attorney form.

(D) Next of kin form authorizing control over body and possessions in case of death.

(2) Incarcerated persons shall have the ability
 to update the forms in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) at any time. At least once a year, the department shall offer incarcerated persons the opportunity to review and update, as necessary, the forms in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1).

(b) Emergency telephone calls shall be made available to persons outside of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and to incarcerated people, as specified under paragraphs (1) and (2). The department shall allow persons outside the facility to initiate a
 telephone call to an incarcerated person in either of the circumstances described in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(1) When the incarcerated person has been admitted to the hospital for a serious
 or critical medical
 condition, as defined in subparagraph (A).

(A) Within 24 hours of an incarcerated person being hospitalized for a serious or critical medical condition, the department shall inform all
 persons covered by the current medical release of information form about the incarcerated person’s health status, and shall facilitate telephone calls between the incarcerated person and those persons if the incarcerated person consents. A serious or critical medical condition may include any of the following:

(i) A medical professional has determined that the incarcerated person needs medical treatment for a terminal disease.

(ii) A medical professional has determined that the incarcerated person needs to receive life-sustaining medical treatment.

(iii) The incarcerated person has been admitted to a public or community hospital.

(B) If the incarcerated person has died, the department shall notify all persons covered by the current medical release of information form and next of kin form within 24 hours.

(C) If the incarcerated person is able to provide knowing and voluntary consent, the department shall, within 24 hours of being admitted to a hospital within a prison, ask the incarcerated person whether
 they want to add people to any of the forms included in
 subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The department shall promptly assist, as able, the incarcerated person in completing the paperwork. The department shall promptly inform the designated persons on the medical release form of the incarcerated person’s condition and facilitate a
 telephone call between the incarcerated person and the designated
 persons, if one is requested.

(2) The department shall maintain a telephone line for outside people to call to inform the department that a family member or a person designated in any of the forms in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (a) has become critically ill or has died while the incarcerated person has been hospitalized. The department shall attempt to verify the identity of the caller and whether the person has become critically ill or has died, and promptly notify the incarcerated person of these calls upon their receipt.

(c) Emergency in-person contact visits and video calls shall be made available whenever an incarcerated person is hospitalized
 due to a serious or critical medical condition, including imminent danger of dying. If in-person contact visits are unavailable at the facility due to a public health emergency or are inconsistent with the patient’s current medical treatment needs, as determined by their medical provider, video calls shall be made available. Any visitor approval process shall be conducted through an expedited process and any request responded to with an approval or a denial
 within 24 hours. If in-person visits are not able to occur within the 24-hour timeframe and the individual is in imminent danger of dying, a video visit shall be offered without clearance. When the incarcerated person is in imminent danger of dying, the department shall allow up to four visitors at one time to visit the incarcerated person. 

(d) For purposes of this section, “hospital” shall include an on-site facility set up to provide hospital-like services during a public health emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 837, Sec. 2.   (SB 1139)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.5.

The department shall have a grievance process in place by which the incarcerated person, or the person designated by the incarcerated person on a form specified in subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 6401, may file a formal grievance to review the failure of the department to provide the incarcerated person’s health care information and records to the designated person, the department’s failure to provide notice to the designated person as required by subparagraph
 (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 6401, the decision of the department to deny visitation as required by subdivision (c) of Section 6401, or the department’s failure to provide adequate medical care and treatment. The department’s grievance process found in Article 5 (commencing with Section 3999.225) of Subchapter 2 of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations satisfies the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 837, Sec. 3.   (SB 1139)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.8.

The operation of Sections 6401 and 6401.5 is contingent upon the appropriation of funds for these sections by express reference in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 837, Sec. 4.   (SB 1139)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation (CDCR) shall develop policies related to the department’s contraband interdiction efforts for individuals entering CDCR detention facilities. When developed, these policies shall include, but not be limited to, the following specifications:

(a) Application to all individuals, including visitors, all department staff, including executive staff, volunteers, and contract employees.

(b) Use of methods to ensure that profiling is not practiced during random searches or searches of all individuals entering the prison at that time.

(c) Establishment of unpredictable, random
 search efforts and methods that ensures that no one, except department employees specifically designated to conduct the random search, shall have advance notice of when a random search is scheduled.

(d) All visitors attempting to enter a CDCR detention facility shall be informed that they may refuse to be searched by a passive alert dog.

(e) All visitors attempting to enter a CDCR detention facility who refuse to be searched by a passive alert dog shall be informed of options, including, but not limited to, the availability of a noncontact visit.

(f) All individuals attempting to enter a CDCR detention facility, who have a positive alert for contraband by an electronic drug detection device, a passive alert dog, or other technology, shall be informed of further potential search or visitation options.

(g) Establishment of a method by which an individual may demonstrate an authorized health-related use of a controlled substance when a positive alert is noted by an electronic drug detection device, a passive alert dog, or other technology.

(h) Establishment of specific requirements for additional search options when multiple positive alerts occur on an individual employee within a specified timeframe.

(i) In determining which additional search options to offer visitors and staff, CDCR shall consider the use of full-body scanners.

(j) CDCR shall conduct an evaluation of a policy described in this section and provide an interim report to the Legislature by June 30, 2016, and a final report to the Legislature on April 30, 2017. This evaluation shall include,
 but not be limited to, the impact of the policy on:

(1) The amount of contraband, including drugs and cellular phones, found in the prisons where the policy was implemented.

(2) The number of staff assaults that occurred in the prisons where the policy was implemented.

(3) The number of serious rules violation reports issued in prisons where the policy was implemented, including any reduction in offender violence.

(4) The rates of drug use by inmates in the prisons where the policy was implemented.

(k) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (j) is inoperative on June 30, 2020, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) The reports to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (j) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 31.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

Inmates shall not be prohibited from family visits based solely on the fact that the inmate was sentenced to life without the possibility of parole or was sentenced to life and is without a parole date established by the Board of Parole Hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 32.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.5.

(a) The department shall expedite a family visitation application process for incarcerated pregnant persons in order to prevent delays for visitation for the incarcerated mother and newborn child following delivery. 

(b) Eligibility for family visitation for the incarcerated mother to see their newborn child shall be allowed as available, unless the department has made a case-by-case determination that the incarcerated mother would pose a threat of harm to their newborn child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 738, Sec. 3.   (AB 2740)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

(a) By July 1, 2024, upon request by a visitor, the department shall scan documents into the Strategic Offender Management Systems (SOMS), including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A birth certificate for a visiting minor.

(2) A parental consent form for a visiting minor.

(3) A marriage license or domestic partnership form for a person attending an approved family visit.

(4) A birth certificate for a parent or sibling attending an approved family visit.

(5) A medical note
 for a visitor.

(b) For an in-person visit, the department shall allow a visitor with an infant or toddler to bring items, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A combination of six factory-sealed single-serving packets of baby formula or four transparent plastic baby bottles or cups that are empty or contain premixed formula, milk, almond milk, soy milk, rice milk, lactose-free milk, juice, or water; a breast pump and associated supplies; and refrigerated or frozen breastmilk.

(2) Six nonglass containers of baby food or snacks in sealed packaging.

(3) Two plastic spoons.

(4) Ten disposable diapers.

(5) One
 sealed package of baby wipes.

(6) Three changes of clothing.

(7) Two small blankets.

(8) Two pacifiers.

(9) Three burp cloths.

(10) Diaper cream.

(11) A baby carrier or wrap.

(12) A clear plastic diaper bag.

(c) For an approved family visit, the department shall allow a visitor to bring items, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Personal linens, including a mattress cover, flat sheet, fitted sheet, single layer
 blanket, bath towel, hand towel, and washcloth, for each person and for the length of the visit.

(2) A bath mat and disposable shower curtain.

(3) An unopened, sealed lubricant bottle.

(4) Items for infants or toddlers, including all of the following:

(A) A combination of 14 factory-sealed single-serving packets of baby formula; one factory-sealed container of milk for each day of the visit, including formula milk, almond milk, soy milk, oat milk, rice milk, or lactose-free milk; four transparent plastic baby bottles or cups; a breast pump and associated supplies; and refrigerated or frozen breastmilk.

(B) Two gallons of factory-sealed distilled water.

(C) Factory-sealed juice.

(D) Six nonglass containers of baby food or snacks in sealed packaging for each day of the visit.

(E) Two plastic spoons.

(F) One package of diapers.

(G) One sealed package of baby wipes.

(H) Three changes of clothing for each day of the visit.

(I) Two small blankets.

(J) Two pacifiers.

(K) Three burp cloths.

(L) Diaper cream.

(M) A baby carrier or wrap.

(N) A clear plastic diaper bag.

(d) For an in-person visit or an approved family visit, the department shall allow a visitor to bring menstrual hygiene products.

(e) For an in-person visit or an approved family visit, the department shall allow a visiting minor to, at minimum, bring two non-battery-operated toys, two children’s books, and up to 10 pages of homework or coloring pages.

(f) This section does not preclude the department from conducting routine inspections of these items, including to search for contraband and to identify potential security risks.

(g) For purposes of this section, the
 following definitions apply:

(1) “Infant” means a child less than 12 months of age.

(2) “Toddler” means a child 12 to 36, inclusive, months of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 22.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.9. Prisoner Protections for Family and Community Health Act [6500. - 6500.]

6500.

Based on the recommendations contained in the “Evaluation of a Prisoner Condom Access Pilot Program Conducted in One California State Prison Facility” report, and in light of the successful pilot project conducted at California State Prison, Solano, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop a five-year plan to expand the availability of condoms in all California prisons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 587, Sec. 2.   (AB 966)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Master Plan Construction [7000. - 7050.]

7000.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall prepare plans for, and construct facilities and renovations included within, its master plan for which funds have been appropriated by the Legislature.

(b) “Master plan” means the department’s “Facility Requirements Plan,” dated April 7, 1980, and any subsequent revisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 15.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7001.

Any power, function, or jurisdiction for planning or construction of facilities or renovations pursuant to the master plan which is conferred by statute upon the Department of General Services shall be deemed to be conferred upon the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 540, Sec. 6.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

7002.

The department may transfer the responsibility for undertaking any aspect of the master plan to the Department of General Services or the Office of the State Architect which, upon such transfer, shall perform those functions with all deliberate speed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 540, Sec. 6.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

7003.

For each facility or project included within its master plan, at least 30 days prior to submission of preliminary plans to the State Public Works Board, the department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee all of the following:

(a) A preliminary plan submittal package, as defined by the State Administrative Manual.
